assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abunde/rGSt
acarrear/REPD
acuartelen/h
acudir/RPED
aglomerar/RDEA
ahilar/PI
aligue/fS
alimentamos/r
alimentis/r
alia/h
alisar/RDEB
altisonante/SF
aludir/Q
amansar/RPDE
amarilla/M
andamio/SC
ando/th
anual/KS
aova/N
apegaste/h
apetecer/RILD
aplicable/JS
aponer/A
arabio/OS
arborescente/FS
are/rSGpt
arguya/p
arla/t
arrendataria/s
arrinconar/PRED
ascender/RLQID
asen/trh
asiesen/h
atildar/PB
aventar/BPC
azada/NHS
balas/c
bandolero/SGO
barbemos/h
baro/SC
barramos/r
bellote/NGS
biten/pa
bobada/aSi
bodoque/HS
bordee/GpS
braza/C
buses/da
caer/hRLgIpD
calan/ipl
cal/ilp
callantar/aRDE
cambiarme/l
canela/N
cantaba/iSgh
canto/NLSH
carenar/ERDB
carga/rhiSp
carguen/hpr
carne/SC
caro/MS
carroad/i
casual/OKS
cavo/npji
ceda/boalfn
cedi/blnof
centr/hfi
centro/ifh
cernido/N
cerrarlo/iSjG
cesare/O
ces/o
chicharran/a
chirriar/DRQI
cho/eGf
cicatero/GLS
cicatrizar/RAED
cilndrico/qSG
cipo/cS
circunferencia/qS
cito/pfk
civil/KkS
cizaan/i
clarn/HS
clarividente/SF
cocos/m
codifica/gh
coged/bprajhi
cogern/ihjbr
cogerse/rbjhi
cogan/rjbih
cogiendo/jbr
cogiere/riSGhbj
cogieseis/brj
cojis/hrjbi
colar/iRpDha
colectores/s
color/eS
comprehender/Q
comprometer/ERPD
comunismo/cS
conceba/nS
conceptuarn/h
conejar/SQ
conglomerar/RAED
conmensurable/kJS
conoced/pnh
constitucional/ckS
contaban/p
continente/kFS
controlado/kGS
convencional/OS
convento/SN
copada/q
copista/Sd
corch/aih
corda/SCL
cortados/j
cortas/jS
creareis/o
crecisemos/r
crestado/GSih
cribis/uh
cristiano/cGS
cruz/LSG
cubra/hpi
cuerda/hSapif
ces/c
culebra/NHS
culto/kGSq
curarte/o
curvo/KS
datan/b
debilitar/AERDP
decent/a
decidir/REDQ
decir/jXplfhn
decs/plnfhj
decoro/kGS
delegamos/s
delegaron/s
denomin/d
depresivo/cSG
derivar/RDEA
desainar/B
desarrollada/s
descendi/f
desecar/AP
desgobernar/B
desplumar/REB
destinad/n
determinado/kdSG
dicho/bSGphfjnlr
difidente/SF
difunto/qGS
dilatable/JS
dique/Sgnk
dirs/jlnfph
disponer/kXnA
distingus/s
divertir/PXQD
diviso/kG
dobla/MCN
doble/qSjpih
doctorar/RPDE
dolaran/pg
dolo/CSL
dominan/n
doras/hSrp
electoral/SO
elocuente/FS
embragar/RhDE
eminente/SFt
emite/uSG
empedernecer/RDIL
empicotar/RBED
emplac/p
encapricho/h
encostrar/RDEB
enfrentar/RDEP
engrandecer/RPDLI
enquistan/e
entenebrecer/RILD
ente/qgS
entiende/trhs
entrecoma/N
entrenara/h
entuba/C
erogan/g
escardar/REBD
escriben/n
escribiere/uGSn
escribs/ung
es/eS
eslabonan/gh
esmeril/HSG
espasmdico/GcS
especular/ARED
espernancad/g
esquiva/M
establecer/RPILD
estime/GhSs
eterno/GKS
excandecer/RLID
excitable/JS
explanar/RADE
expresar/RQDE
exuberante/FS
faradio/Sm
febrero/N
feder/f
ficha/C
fiero/foGlnukpg
figuren/nfuph
figuro/unhfp
filar/RiDahE
filibustero/SO
filmaba/mS
filmis/m
filmndose/m
filmar/m
filmars/m
filmaremos/m
filmarais/m
filmaron/m
filmsemos/m
filmaste/m
finales/q
firman/akfp
flore/u
fluya/apkf
form/ufhkpg
fosar/REBD
fraude/gS
frecuentar/RDAE
friega/up
funden/ufkipo
fundirte/kpf
gases/pj
generoso/KGS
gestin/kfS
giganta/M
grfica/m
gramatical/acS
granja/LS
gravarla/a
grueso/iG
guarra/HN
hable/GSJ
hato/LSN
hil/hirap
hombre/oStq
hospeda/C
humanitario/GOS
humeral/tS
hundirs/p
iglesia/bS
imant/h
imprescriptible/J
incluir/XDQ
indispensable/J
indulgente/FS
informo/K
inmediata/M
intangible/J
interrogar/AE
irreductible/J
jeta/H
jurament/f
justamente/k
juveneced/p
juvenecer/RIpDL
juzga/n
lactante/FS
lama/haSip
laminarn/i
lastimar/REDB
lateral/eSf
latifundio/OS
lenta/N
levo/Gps
linden/haf
lineal/KS
linear/aRjDglE
llanos/pc
luce/upShjni
lucida/M
lucid/phjnui
lunar/sSqa
lustren/hka
mandaros/g
man/hoap
mano/hperabo
marrn/HS
maticen/d
mediar/pjog
mediis/pjog
medi/ojlgp
mediten/n
mema/M
merecer/RIPLD
meridiana/b
metieron/j
migra/uk
misin/lSuop
moda/O
modorrad/a
monta/hC
montamos/uhi
montremos/u
mortal/SkK
mostrars/gn
motor/eGoSd
movilice/kSh
movilizo/kGh
movi/opaf
mutacin/uSf
nacionalista/Sl
nares/jle
notar/RngfaED
not/angf
nuncios/la
nupcial/Sb
nutrir/hRDAE
ublar/a
oleaginoso/KSG
omnipotente/SF
opresar/Q
rdenes/hs
oriundo/MSG
oscurecer/RIPDL
oxidante/cSh
oyerais/j
pagara/oSp
palma/N
palote/SH
parlamentario/clSG
parlamentar/RODE
partido/kSg
pasndola/r
pasan/orph
pasible/kJS
pelagiano/qGS
pelis/k
penda/kgo
perche/iSG
peregrina/C
piensan/p
pilar/iRDagE
pinchar/RBDE
pintar/rhp
pistolete/SH
plausible/JS
poned/ukgptalonbr
ponerme/koprl
ponga/ukgptalonbr
pona/urbnolatkgp
ponindonosla/k
porcin/oS
poroso/GSK
port/uapgk
poseer/RQLDE
preciosa/q
preexistente/SF
prendan/ilhg
pronto/MGS
proporcione/h
psiquis/O
publicar/RAED
pudor/kS
puesto/aSGltkrunopg
purra/ai
puse/ouagpltrknb
quilla/rS
raspada/gS
rateen/o
real/kKS
rebelar/RQDE
recatn/GH
rectngulos/e
redoblar/RPB
refinado/qS
reforzar/P
regula/d
regul/d
reja/N
reluctante/SF
reporta/C
respondo/fL
reumtica/c
revocable/kJS
rifar/ERDB
rijamos/f
rogndole/lS
rubicundo/GMS
salm/ig
salten/rap
sambenitan/i
san/ea
san/rsp
sector/Se
segunden/a
sellamos/pg
sents/fpna
sequ/egp
servil/SO
sifiltico/GSc
sigis/fsop
siguieran/os
sigui/fsop
simple/KMS
sobrio/KSG
sonsacar/REPD
substancia/g
suelo/sSfj
sugestionad/dG
sugestionar/d
sugestionareis/d
sugestionaron/d
sugestionasteis/d
sugestion/d
suministrar/RDEA
sums/nkfaps
suplente/FS
surcos/ejm
suspender/DQER
tamboril/SH
tan/epa
taris/f
tasen/epf
tendamos/fns
tendida/snaf
tensa/sShnk
teste/ikGoSfag
tizn/i
tomate/NHS
tnica/o
tosigue/ia
traducs/p
trado/pafGSg
transparentes/q
traste/HS
trincaban/hk
tund/fp
vaha/C
valorar/RtaDhE
valva/eS
vanguardia/SO
vanilocuente/SF
variable/kJS
varan/hj
ved/bpjn
vena/fatsrlgpno
venusta/M
verdecer/pDRiIL
vertimos/fks
vidrioso/GKS
vinar/pi
vino/noltirafgps
visad/tpa
vista/nikrpahjo
visten/ajihrkp
vivencia/tf
